Nevada, session 83, AB83.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. Chapter 236 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto a new section to read as follows:
1. The Governor shall annually proclaim October 25 to be
“Larry Itliong Day” in the State of Nevada.
2. The proclamation must call upon the news media,
educators, business and labor leaders and appropriate
governmental officers to bring to the attention of the residents of
Nevada the important contributions Larry Itliong made to the
State of Nevada and the United States.
Sec. 2. This act becomes effective upon passage and approval.
20 ~~~~~ 25
-
83rd Session (2025)